Hawaii statutes.
§465-7.6 Licensure of state employed
clinical psychologists. (a) A psychologist employed in a civil service
clinical psychologist position in this State after January 1, 1988, shall be
licensed subject to:

(1) Meeting the requirements of section 465-7; and

(2) Obtaining licensure within two years from the
date of employment.

(b) After the time period in subsection (a)(2)
has expired, a psychologist, employed in a civil service clinical psychologist
position rendering diagnostic or treatment services, who has not obtained a
license, shall immediately cease and desist the practice of psychology until a
license is obtained pursuant to this chapter. [L 1988, c 197, §3; am L 1997, c
37, §4; am L 2003, c 79, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next